Florida, session 2026, SB434.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 193.6245, Florida Statutes, is created 16 to read: 17 193.6245âAssessment of property; changes or improvements 18 for resistance to wind damage.â 19 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âchanges or 20 improvements made to improve the propertyâs resistance to wind 21 damageâ includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: 22 (a)âImproving the strength of the roof deck attachment. 23 (b)âCreating a secondary water barrier to prevent water 24 intrusion. 25 (c)âInstalling wind-resistant shingles. 26 (d)âInstalling gable-end bracing. 27 (e)âReinforcing roof-to-wall connections. 28 (f)âInstalling storm shutters. 29 (g)âInstalling opening protections. 30 (2)âIn determining the assessed value of real property used 31 for residential purposes, any increase in just value of a 32 property which is attributable to changes or improvements made 33 to improve the propertyâs resistance to wind damage may not be 34 considered. 35 (3)âThis section applies to changes or improvements made to 36 improve the propertyâs resistance to wind damage made on or 37 after January 1, 2027. 38 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.